Missouri, session 2026, SB1375.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 37.020, RSMo, is repealed and seven
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
37.020, 37.760, 37.762, 37.764, 37.766, 37.768, and 37.770, to
read as follows:
37.020. 1. As used in this section, the following
words and phrases mean:
(1) "Certification", the determination, through
whatever procedure is used by the office of administration,
that a legal entity is a socially and economically
disadvantaged small business concern for purposes of this
section;
(2) "Department", the office of administration and any
public institution of higher learning in the state of
Missouri;
(3) "Minority business enterprise", a business that is:
(a) A sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a
minority;
(b) A partnership or joint venture owned and
controlled by minorities in which at least fifty-one percent
of the ownership interest is held by minorities and the

SB 1375 2
management and daily business operations of which are
controlled by one or more of the minorities who own it; or
(c) A corporation or other entity whose management and
daily business operations are controlled by one or more
minorities who own it, and which is at least fifty-one
percent owned by one or more minorities, or if stock is
issued, at least fifty-one percent of the stock is owned by
one or more minorities;
(4) "Socially and economically disadvantaged
individuals", individuals, regardless of gender, who have
been subjected to racial, ethnic, or sexual prejudice or
cultural bias because of their identity as a member of a
group without regard to their individual qualities and whose
ability to compete in the free enterprise system has been
impaired due to diminished capital and credit opportunities
as compared to others in the same business area. In
determining the degree of diminished credit and capital
opportunities the office of administration shall consider,
but not be limited to, the assets and net worth of such
individual;
(5) "Socially and economically disadvantaged small
business concern", any small business concern:
(a) Which is at least fifty-one percentum owned by one
or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals;
or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least
fifty-one percentum of the stock of which is owned by one or
more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals; and
(b) Whose management and daily business operations are
controlled by one or more of such individuals;
(6) "Women's business enterprise", a business that is:
(a) A sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a
woman;

SB 1375 3
(b) A partnership or joint venture owned and
controlled by women in which at least fifty-one percent of
the ownership interest is held by women and the management
and daily business operations of which are controlled by one
or more of the women who own it; or
(c) A corporation or other entity whose management and
daily business operations are controlled by one or more
women who own it, and which is at least fifty-one percent
owned by women, or if stock is issued, at least fifty-one
percent of the stock is owned by one or more women.
2. The office of administration, in consultation with
each department, shall establish and implement a plan to
increase and maintain the participation of certified
socially and economically disadvantaged small business
concerns or minority business enterprises, directly or
indirectly, in contracts for supplies, services, and
construction contracts, consistent with goals determined
after an appropriate study conducted to determine the
availability of socially and economically disadvantaged
small business concerns and minority business enterprises in
the marketplace. Such study shall be completed by December
31, 2028. The commissioner of administration shall appoint
an oversight review committee to oversee and review the
results of such study. The committee shall be composed of
nine members, four of whom shall be members of business,
three of whom shall be from staff of selected departments,
one of whom shall be a member of the house of
representatives, and one of whom shall be a member of the
senate.
3. The goals to be pursued by each department under
the provisions of this section shall be construed to overlap
with those imposed by federal law or regulation, if any,

SB 1375 4
shall run concurrently therewith and shall be in addition to
the amount required by federal law only to the extent the
percentage set by this section exceeds those required by
federal law or regulations.
4. The commissioner of administration may designate a
nonprofit organization as a minority business enterprise or
women's business enterprise for the exclusive purpose of
competing in other states, provided that the organization is
headquartered in Missouri and the collective majority of the
organization's board of directors and executive management
in charge of daily business operations are minorities or
women.
37.760. As used in sections 37.760 to 37.770, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Agency", any state department or any division or
branch thereof, or any bureau, board, commission,
institution, officer or office of the state of Missouri;
(2) "Commissioner", the commissioner of administration
appointed under section 37.010;
(3) "Committee", the minority business enterprise and
women's business enterprise oversight review committee
created under section 37.762;
(4) "Minority business enterprise", the same meaning
as defined in section 37.020;
(5) "Women's business enterprise", the same meaning as
defined in section 37.020.
37.762. 1. There is hereby established the "Minority
Business Enterprise and Women's Business Enterprise
Oversight Review Committee". The committee shall consist of
seven members. The governor shall appoint four members to
the committee, two of whom shall represent the interests of
the minority community in this state, and two of whom shall

SB 1375 5
represent the interests of business owners in this state.
The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
one member of the committee from the house of
representatives. The president pro tempore of the senate
shall appoint one member from the senate. The commissioner
shall be an ex officio member of the committee.
2. The committee shall conduct a new study, in
addition to the study required by subsection 2 of section
37.020, to ensure participation from socially and
economically disadvantaged minority or women's business
enterprises. Such study shall be completed by December 31,
2027.
37.764. Members of the committee shall not be
compensated for their services, but they shall be reimbursed
for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties. The members of the committee
shall elect one member as chair and one member as vice chair
who shall serve as chair in the absence of the chair. Each
member shall serve for a term of two years and may be
reappointed for an additional term of two years. The office
of administration shall provide staff to the committee and
aid it in the performance of its duties.
37.766. The specific duties of the committee shall
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Compiling a database of minority business
enterprises and women's business enterprises, certified
under section 37.023, that have participated, directly or
indirectly, in contracts for supplies, services, and
construction with any agency of this state, and making such
database available to all agencies;
(2) Making recommendations to agencies for
implementation of a system to alert minority business

SB 1375 6
enterprises and women's business enterprises, certified
under section 37.023, of upcoming contracts for supplies,
services, and construction;
(3) Establishing requirements for parties to contract
with agencies for supplies, services, or construction that
need subcontractors to notify potential subcontractors who
are minority business enterprises and women's business
enterprises, certified under section 37.023, of the party's
need for a subcontractor. Such requirements shall include,
but not be limited to:
(a) Written notification sent to the certified
minority business enterprise or women's business
enterprise's principal place of business; and
(b) Maintaining records of the notifications sent
under paragraph (a) of this subdivision; and
(4) Proposing sanctions for parties failing to comply
with any requirements established under subdivision (3) of
this section.
37.768. 1. The office of administration shall enforce
the requirements developed by the committee under
subdivision (3) of section 37.766.
2. The office of administration shall promulgate rules
necessary for the enforcement of such requirements and
necessary to aid the committee in performing its duties
under section 37.766. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective

SB 1375 7
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
37.770. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under
sections 37.760 to 37.768 shall automatically sunset six
years after the effective date of sections 37.760 to 37.768
unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
authorized under sections 37.760 to 37.768 shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date
of the reauthorization of sections 37.760 to 37.768; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized under sections 37.760 to 37.768
is sunset.
✓